asheninka.guesser.script
#      source n-s-1.foma
#      source n-s-2.foma
#      source n-s-3.foma
      source noun.suffix.prq.script
      source noun.transitions.prq.script

      define NSuff [ N ]; #(N=S=1) (N=S=2) (N=S=3)] ;

      ###################################
      #          Lenition Rules         #
      ###################################

      define PWLenitionRule1 [ "@PHONPROC@"p (->) "@PHONPROC@"v || [{o}] _ [{i}|{a}|{o}] ]; 
                                                                            # nopito (in our lexicon) -> no@PHONPROC@pito -> no@PHONPROC@vito -> novito 
                                                                            # nopochokine (in our lexicon) -> no@PHONPROC@pochokine -> no@PHONPROC@bochokine -> nobochokine 
      define PWLenitionRule2 [ "@PHONPROC@"p (->) "@PHONPROC@"v || [{i}] _ [{e}|{i}|{a}|{o}] ]; 
                                                                            # ipentaki (in our lexicon) -> i@PHONPROC@pentaki -> i@PHONPROC@ventaki -> iventaki 
                                                                            # ipanko (in our lexicon) -> i@PHONPROC@panko -> i@PHONPROC@vanko -> ivanko 
                                                                            # pipompooti (in our lexicon) -> pi@PHONPROC@pompooti -> pi@PHONPROC@vompooti -> pivompooti 
      define PWLenitionRule3 [ "@PHONPROC@"p (->) "@PHONPROC@"v || [{a}] _ [{a}|{i}|{o}] ]; 
                                                                            # apankopaye 
                                                                            # apinkatsarite (in our lexicon) -> a@PHONPROC@pinkatsarite -> a@PHONPROC@vinkatsarite -> avinkatsarite 
                                                                            # COMPOUNDS vatsapori (in our lexicon) -> vatsa@PHONPROC@pori -> vatsa@PHONPROC@vori -> vatsavori
                                                                            # aporoni 
      define PWLenitionRule4 [ "@PHONPROC@"p (->) "@PHONPROC@"v || [{e}] _ [{i}|{o}|{a}] ]; 
      
      define PWLenitionRule5 [ "@PHONPROC@"p (->) "@PHONPROC@"v || [{pi}] _ [{i}] ]; 
      
      define PLenitionRule1 [ "@PHONPROC@"p (->) "@PHONPROC@" || [{no}] _ [{a}] ]; 
                                                                            # noajoni 
      define PLenitionRule2 [ "@PHONPROC@"p (->) "@PHONPROC@" || .#. [{o}] _ [{a}] ]; 
                                                                            # oarentite 
      
      define KJLenitionRule1 [ "@PHONPROC@"k (->) "@PHONPROC@"y || _ [{o}|{a}|{e}|{i}] ]; 
      define KJLenitionRule2 [ "@PHONPROC@"c (->) "@PHONPROC@"y || _ [{o}|{a}|{e}|{i}] ]; 
                                                                            # optional rule: noyokani, ikentsike  
                                                                            # nokimini (in our lexicon) -> no@PHONPROC@kimini -> no@PHONPROC@yimini -> noyimini
      define KLenitionRule2 [ "@PHONPROC@"k (->) "@PHONPROC@" || [{o}] _ [{i}|{e}|{a}|{o}] ]; 
                                                                            # nokitzi (in our lexicon) -> no@PHONPROC@kitzi -> no@PHONPROC@itzi -> noitzi
                                                                            # nokanire (in our lexicon) -> no@PHONPROC@kanire -> no@PHONPROC@anire -> noanire
                                                                            # nokonta (in our lexicon) -> no@PHONPROC@onta -> no@PHONPROC@onta -> noonta 
                                                                            # okomaro (in our lexicon) -> o@PHONPROC@omaro -> o@PHONPROC@omaro -> oomaro-janiqui
                                                                            # oketsa (in our lexicon) -> o@PHONPROC@etsa -> o@PHONPROC@etsa -> o-etsa-re-ki
      define KLenitionRule3 [ "@PHONPROC@"k (->) "@PHONPROC@" || [{i}] _ [{i}] ]; ! not working.. why??? 
                                                                            # ikishi (in our lexicon) -> i@PHONPROC@kishi -> i@PHONPROC@ishi -> iishi 
                                                                            # ikitsoki (in our lexicon) -> i@PHONPROC@kitsoki -> i@PHONPROC@itsoki -> iitsoki 
      define KLenitionRule4 [ "@PHONPROC@"k (->) "@PHONPROC@" || [{p}] _ [{i}] ]; 
                                                                            # pkitsare (in our lexicon) -> p@PHONPROC@kitsare -> p@PHONPROC@itsare -> pitsare 
      define KLenitionRule5 [ "@PHONPROC@"k (->) "@PHONPROC@" || [{o}] _ [{i}] ]; ! oitsoki -> o=kitsoki 
      define KLenitionRule6 [ "@PHONPROC@"k (->) "@PHONPROC@" || [{a}] _ [{i}] ]; ! aitsoki -> a=kitsoki 

      define Lenition [ PWLenitionRule1 .o. PWLenitionRule2 .o. PWLenitionRule3 .o. PWLenitionRule4 
 .o. PLenitionRule1 .o.  PLenitionRule2  
 .o. KJLenitionRule1 .o. KJLenitionRule2 
 .o. KLenitionRule2 
 .o. KLenitionRule3 
 .o. KLenitionRule4 
 .o. KLenitionRule5 
 .o. KLenitionRule6 
];

      #########################################
      #          Vowel Deletion Rules         #
      #########################################
      # noirani (in our lexicon) -> no@PHONPROC@irani -> n@PHONPROC@irani -> nirani 
#      define VowelLossRule1 [ o"@PHONPROC@" -> "@PHONPROC@" || n _ [{i}|{o}|{a}] ]; 
#      define VowelLossRule2 [ i"@PHONPROC@" -> "@PHONPROC@" || p _ [{i}|{o}|{a}] ]; 
      define VowelLossRule3 [ i"@PHONPROC@" (->) "@PHONPROC@" || _ [{i}] ]; 
      define VowelLossRule4 [ o"@PHONPROC@" (->) "@PHONPROC@" || _ [{o}] ]; 
      
#      define VowelLoss [ VowelLossRule1 .o. VowelLossRule2 ];
      define VowelLoss [ VowelLossRule3 .o. VowelLossRule4 ];
      
      ####################################
      #                                  #
      #          Noun                    #
      #     Restricctions                #
      #                                  #
      ####################################
      define PossPlusInalRestr1 [~$["@PHONPROC@"?*"@NPOSS"]]; ! it is possible that this is a badly designed rule 
      define PossPlusAlnPossRestr1 [ ["@ALNPOSS@"] => ?*"@PHONPROC@"?* _ ?* ]; ! an aln.poss suffix should only appear in case there is a possessive prefix 
      
      define PossessiveRestr1 [ Cons => .#. ~[[{r}|{n}|{p}]"@PHONPROC@"] _  ];
      define PossessiveRestr2 [ Cons => .#. ~[{ir}"@PHONPROC@"] _  ];
      
      define PossessiveRestr3 [ Vowels => .#. ~[{no}"@PHONPROC@"] _  ]; ! noito ??? oitontsi ??? 
      define PossessiveRestr4 [ [{o}] => .#. ~[{pi}"@PHONPROC@"] _  ]; ! pio 
      
      define IRestr1 [ ["@I@"] => {i} _ ]; 
      define IRestr2 [ ["@IDIM@"] => {i} _ ]; 
      define NIRestr1 [ ["@NI@"] => {ni} _ ]; 
      
      define NounFeatRestr [ PossPlusInalRestr1 .o. PossessiveRestr1 .o. PossessiveRestr2 .o. PossessiveRestr4 
.o. IRestr1 .o. IRestr2 
.o. NIRestr1 .o. PossPlusAlnPossRestr1 ];
      
      #source nroot.prq.foma
      #source aroot.prq.foma
      # Spanish loan words
      #source nroot.es.foma
      # Quechua loan words 
      #source nroot.qu.foma
      # Portuguese loan words
      #source nroot.pt.foma
      #source numeral.prq.foma

      # Compound nouns
      #source noun.cmp.prq.foma
      #define NRootCmpPRQ NRootCmpPRQin;

#      source nroot.es.freeling.00.foma
#      define NRootESFreeling00 NRootESFreelingin00 .o. UpperCase; 
#      source nroot.es.freeling.01.foma
#      define NRootESFreeling01 NRootESFreelingin01 .o. UpperCase; 
#      source nroot.es.freeling.02.foma
#      define NRootESFreeling02 NRootESFreelingin02 .o. UpperCase; 
#      source nroot.es.freeling.03.foma
#      define NRootESFreeling03 NRootESFreelingin03 .o. UpperCase; 
      
      #source place.names.foma 

      #define NRootFreeling [NRootESFreeling00|NRootESFreeling01|NRootESFreeling02|NRootESFreeling03];
      define nsyllable ConsRoot* VowelRoot^{1,2} ConsRoot*;
      define NRootPRQ [ ["[="] :0 ] [ vsyllable+ ] [ ["+GUESS][NRoot]"] :0 ] ;
      ####################################
      #     Compound nouns               #
      ####################################
      # the lenition process is found at the root-root boundary in noun compounds 
      # vatsavori / 'vatsa-pori' / 'meat-muscle' 
      # caavovaniri~kaavovaniri / 'kaavo-kaniri' / ES: 'caña-yuca', EN: 'sugar.cane-yucca' 
      # camatoyaniri / '' 
      # tsireentsiyaniri / '' 
      define PWLenitionRuleCmpNoun1 [ "@PHONPROCCMPNOUN@"p (->) "@PHONPROCCMPNOUN@"v || [{a}] _ [{i}|{o}] ]; 
      define KWLenitionRuleCmpNoun2 [ "@PHONPROCCMPNOUN@"k (->) "@PHONPROCCMPNOUN@"v || [{o}] _ [{a}] ]; 
      define KYLenitionRuleCmpNoun3 [ "@PHONPROCCMPNOUN@"k (->) "@PHONPROCCMPNOUN@"y || [{o}|{i}] _ [{a}] ]; 
      
      define LenitionCmpNoun [ PWLenitionRuleCmpNoun1 .o. KWLenitionRuleCmpNoun2 .o. KYLenitionRuleCmpNoun3 ];  

      ############################
      #      Noun transducer     #
      ############################
      define Noun [ (NPref) [NRootPRQ] ("@PHONPROCCMPNOUN@"NRootCmpPRQ) (NSuff) ] .o. Lenition .o. VowelLoss .o. LenitionCmpNoun .o. NounFeatRestr ; #.o. VowelLoss ;
      
      ##########################
      #                        #
      #   Nominalized verb     #
      #                        #
      ##########################
      # Nominalized verbs 
      define NPOSSRestr1 [ ["@NPOSS"[{ntsi}|{ntzi}|{nti}|{nchi}]] => ["@EP"[{ro}|{vo}|{re}|{ri}]"@NMZ@"] _ ]; 
      define NPOSSRestr2 [ ["@NPOSS"[{tsi}|{tzi}]] => ["@EP"[{mento}|{minto}]"@NMZ@"] _ ];

      define NominalizedVerbFeatRestr [ NPOSSRestr1 .o. NPOSSRestr2 ];

      define NominalizedVerb [ (NPref) [VRootPRQ] ( [
                                                     [APPLINT DUR] 
                                                   | [APPLGEN] # tseeyakotaantsi / =tsee -ako -t -aantsi / =to.lie -applgen -ep -ing / ES: 'difamar'; EN: 'to.defame; to.slander'  
                                                   | [APPLBEN] 
                                                   | [APPLSEP] # aapitsataantsi / =a-apitsa-t-aantsi ES: 'sustracción', EN: 'rest'
                                                   | [DLMT] # i-tsipa-bintsa-ri-te  
                                                   | [RCP CAUSSOC] # nashitavakaantsi / =nashi -t -aV -ak -aantsi / =to.separate -ep -rcp -caus.soc -inf / EN: 'to.get.divorced' 
                                                                 # ohokavakaaja / o- =hok -av -ak -a -ah -a / 3n.m.s- =to.leave -rcp -caus.soc -ep -regr -real / EN: 'they.got.separated', ES: 'se.han.separado (pareja)'  
                                                   | [REV] # =pai-ry-aantsi 'to.say.someone's.name'
                                                   | [FRUS] # 
                                                   | [AUG] # ipiroaantsi / =ir -piro -aantsi / =to.drink -degr -inf / EN: 'to.drink.well'
                                                   | [SENSORY] # kisanintantzinkari / =kis -a -nint -antzinkari 
                                                   | [APPLREAS] # añaantarentsi 
                                                   | [DUR] # ñaabaementotsiki  
                                                  ] )
                                                  # konatsapiyarentsi / =kona -tsapiya -re -ntsi / =to.fish.with.barbasco -cl:side.of.river -nmz -nposs / EN: 'activity.of.fishing.with.barbasco.at.the.bank.of.the.river', ES: 'pesca.nocturna.con.barbasco.a.orillas.del.río'  
                                                  [ CL|[CL [NMZ|ADJ]]|[NMZ|ADJ] ] (NRootCmpPRQ) 
                                                  (NSuff) ] .o. Lenition .o. NounFeatRestr .o. NominalizedVerbFeatRestr .o. Epenthesis ; # .o. VowelLoss ;
      
